Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB293.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 16 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a part to read:PART VLICENSESChapter181. Electronic Device LicensesCHAPTER 181ELECTRONIC DEVICE LICENSESSec.18101. Definitions.18102. License required.18103. Records of transactions.18104. Retention of electronic devices and availability for 123456789101112131415161718 inspection.18105. Purchases from minors.18106. Local ordinances.18107. Inspection of licensee.18108. Penalty.18109. Regulations and applicability.§ 18101. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Dealer of electronic devices." An individual, partnership, association, corporation or business entity, or any member thereof, that purchases or possesses electronic devices from the general public for resale or an individual who acts as an agent for an individual, partnership, association, corporation or business entity for the purchase or possession of electronic devices. The term does not include an individual or entity that purchases or possesses electronic devices on behalf of a charitable organization as that term is defined in section 3 of the act of December 19, 1990 (P.L.1200, No.202), known as the Solicitation of Funds for Charitable Purposes Act."Electronic device." A device which accomplishes its purpose electronically and any component or accessory of the device."Transaction." A purchase or consignment of an electronic device by a dealer of electronic devices, other than as an allowance for the trade-in or exchange of the electronic device on the purchase of a new electronic device of the same kind from a dealer primarily engaged in the business of selling new electronic devices . § 18102. License required.20250HB0293PN0237 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Dealer.--A dealer of electronic devices must obtain a license from the sheriff of the county in which the dealer purchases or possesses the electronic devices.(b) Application form.--The application for a license under this section shall be on a form as prescribed by regulations promulgated by the Attorney General.(c) License fee.--A license fee in an amount not to exceed $50, as prescribed by the Attorney General, shall be paid annually. The fee shall be paid into the treasury of the county where the license is issued.(d) Duration of license.--A license issued under this chapter shall be valid for one year.(e) Public record.--A license application under this section shall be a public record and be available to the general public for inspection.§ 18103. Records of transactions.(a) Recordkeeping.--A dealer of electronic devices shall keep a record of every transaction upon a form approved by the Attorney General. The record shall include, at a minimum:(1) The name, age and address of the seller, which must be verified by the dealer of electronic devices, requiring photographic proof of identity from the seller sufficient to ensure the accuracy of the represented name, age and address of the seller. The dealer of electronic devices must make a photocopy of the identification and retain the photocopy with the record of purchase or consignment for a period of not less than 180 days from date of purchase or consignment.(2) An accurate description of the property purchased, including any serial number or other identifying marks or symbols and the date and time of the transaction.20250HB0293PN0237 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Retention of records.--The dealer of electronic devices shall retain record of a purchase or consignment for a period of 180 days from the date of purchase or consignment and shall make the record available for inspection by any law enforcement official of the Federal Government, the Commonwealth or any of its municipalities.(c) Copy of record to district attorney.--A dealer of electronic devices shall deliver or mail a copy of every transaction, including a photocopy of photographic identification, to the district attorney of the county in which a purchase or consignment of electronic devices is made by the close of the next business day after purchase or consignment.(d) Copy of record to police department in lieu of district attorney.--The district attorney may authorize records required under this section to be delivered or mailed to the police department of the municipality in which the electronic devices were purchased in lieu of delivery or mailing to the district attorney.§ 18104. Retention of electronic devices and availability for inspection.(a) Electronic devices to be retained for five days.--A dealer of electronic devices that purchases an electronic device shall retain the electronic device in unaltered condition for five full working days after a report of its purchase has been filed with the proper district attorney or the district attorney's designee.(b) Electronic devices to be available for inspection.--Electronic devices shall be available for inspection during the retention period required under subsection (a) by law enforcement officials of the Federal Government, the 20250HB0293PN0237 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Commonwealth or any of its municipalities in the course of their law enforcement duties. A search warrant shall not be required unless the inspection is made during hours other than those when the dealer of electronic devices is open for business.(c) Notice.--If a law enforcement official has probable cause to believe an electronic device was stolen, the official may give written notice to the dealer of electronic devices. Upon receipt of the written notice, the dealer of electronic devices shall retain the electronic device in unaltered condition for an additional seven days, unless the law enforcement official recalls the notice in writing.(d) Court-ordered retention.--Upon application of the district attorney, a court of proper jurisdiction may order a dealer of electronic devices to retain an electronic device for a reasonable period.(e) Location.--An electronic device required to be retained under subsection (d) shall be retained within the county of purchase at the location where the dealer of electronic devices purchased the electronic device, unless otherwise authorized in writing by the district attorney or a designee.§ 18105. Purchases from minors.A dealer of electronic devices shall wait three business days after taking possession of an electronic device before providing payment for the electronic device to a person under 18 years of age.§ 18106. Local ordinances.This chapter does not supersede or preclude the adoption of a municipal ordinance applicable to dealers of electronic devices, if the municipal ordinance meets the minimum requirements of this chapter.20250HB0293PN0237 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 18107. Inspection of licensee.The acceptance of a license by a dealer of electronic devices implies consent to inspections of the dealer's premises by law enforcement officials and officials authorized to enforce laws, regulations or ordinances related, directly or indirectly, to disposal of electronic devices.§ 18108. Penalty.(a) Unlicensed purchases.--The purchase of an electronic device by a dealer of electronic devices that does not hold a valid license under this chapter is a violation of this chapter and a misdemeanor of the third degree.(b) Violations by licensed dealers.--A licensed dealer of electronic devices that violates a provision of this chapter commits a misdemeanor of the third degree and shall, upon conviction, be subject to immediate revocation of an existing license issued under this chapter and be ineligible to apply for a license under this chapter for five years thereafter.§ 18109. Regulations and applicability.(a) Attorney General.--The Attorney General shall promulgate regulations for the implementation and operation of this chapter.(b) Prohibition.--This chapter shall not apply to a person until the regulations under subsection (a) have been promulgated.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0293PN0237 - 6 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425